Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB158.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4 of the act of July 13, 1988 (P.L.530, No.94), known as the Environmental Hearing Board Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 4. Jurisdiction.* * *(i) Limitation.--In accordance with 15 U.S.C. § 717r(d)(relating to rehearing and review), the United States Court of Appeals for the Third Circuit shall have original and exclusive jurisdiction over any civil action or other appeal, challenge or petition for review of a department decision issued under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 15B (relating to natural gas) and any person aggrieved by a department decision may file in the United States 123456789101112131415161718192021 Court of Appeals for the Third Circuit a civil action or other appeal, challenge or petition for review of the department decision in accordance with the Federal rules of court.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0158PN0108 - 2 - 1234